src/fst/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON N_38SUEUEK1
:%^PAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
+Err/Orth-no-pal:%^NoPAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
 N_38SUEUEK1-SG ;
 N_38SUEUEK1_PL ;
LEXICON N_38SUEUEK1-SG
:%{front%} NMN_38PUUM1/SUEUEK1-SG ;
LEXICON N_38SUEUEK1_PL
:%{front%} NMN_38PUUM1/SUEUEK1_PL ;

LEXICON N_38HUETT !!= * @CODE@ hütt:hütt
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
 N_38HUETT-SG ;
 N_38HUETT_PL ;
LEXICON N_38HUETT-SG
:%{front%} NMN_38HUETT-SG ;
LEXICON N_38HUETT_PL
:%{front%} NMN_38HUETT_PL ;

LEXICON N_38KULD
:%^StrGStem ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
 N_38KULD-SG ;
 N_38KULD_PL ;
LEXICON N_38KULD-SG
:%{back%} NMN_38KULD-SG ;
LEXICON N_38KULD_PL
:%{back%} NMN_38KULD_PL ;

LEXICON N_38LAND
:%^StrGStem ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
 N_38LAND-SG ;
 N_38LAND_PL ;
LEXICON N_38LAND-SG
:%{back%} NMN_38LAND/HAELL-SG ;
LEXICON N_38LAND_PL
:%{back%} NMN_38LAND/HAELL_PL ;

LEXICON N_38HAELL
:%^StrGStem ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
 N_38HAELL-SG ;
 N_38HAELL_PL ;
LEXICON N_38HAELL-SG
:%{front%} NMN_38LAND/HAELL-SG ;
LEXICON N_38HAELL_PL
:%{front%} NMN_38LAND/HAELL_PL ;

LEXICON N_38POIG !poig:p
:oig ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
 N_38POIG-SG ;
 N_38POIG_PL ;
LEXICON N_38POIG-SG
:%{back%} NMN_38POIG-SG ;
LEXICON N_38POIG_PL
:%{back%} NMN_38POIG_PL ;

LEXICON N_38PUTR
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
 N_38PUTR-SG ;
 N_38PUTR_PL ;
LEXICON N_38PUTR-SG
:%{back%} NMN_38PUTR-SG ;
LEXICON N_38PUTR_PL
:%{back%} NMN_38PUTR_PL ;

LEXICON N_39VIDO !!= * @CODE@ vido:vi%{tØ%}%{tdØ%}o
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
        N_39VIDO-SG ;
        N_39VIDO_PL ;
LEXICON N_39VIDO-SG
:%{back%}     NMN_39VIDO-SG ;
LEXICON N_39VIDO_PL
:%{back%}     NMN_39VIDO_PL ;

LEXICON N_39HAEBUE !!= * @CODE@ häbü:hä%{pØ%}%{pbØ%}ü
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
        N_39HAEBUE-SG ;
        N_39HAEBUE_PL ;
LEXICON N_39HAEBUE-SG
:%{front%}     NMN_39HAEBUE-SG ;
LEXICON N_39HAEBUE_PL
:%{front%}     NMN_39HAEBUE_PL ;

LEXICON N_40TALO !!= @CODE@ talo:ta%{lØ%}lo
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
        N_40TALO-SG ;
        N_40TALO_PL ;
LEXICON N_40TALO-SG
:%{back%}     NMN_40TALO/HELUE-SG ;
LEXICON N_40TALO_PL
:%{back%}     NMN_40TALO/HELUE_PL ;

LEXICON N_40HELUE !!= @CODE@ helü:helü
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
        N_40HELUE-SG ;
        N_40HELUE_PL ;
LEXICON N_40HELUE-SG
:%{front%}     NMN_40TALO/HELUE-SG ;
LEXICON N_40HELUE_PL
:%{front%}     NMN_40TALO/HELUE_PL ;

LEXICON N_40UJA !!= @CODE@ uja:u%{jØ%}ja
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
        N_40UJA-SG ;
        N_40UJA_PL ;
LEXICON N_40UJA-SG
:%{back%}     NMN_40UJA/IJAE-SG ;
LEXICON N_40UJA_PL
:%{back%}     NMN_40UJA/IJAE_PL ;

LEXICON N_40IJAE !!= @CODE@ ijä:i%{jØ%}jä
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
        N_40IJAE-SG ;
        N_40IJAE_PL ;
LEXICON N_40IJAE-SG
:%{front%}     NMN_40UJA/IJAE-SG ;
LEXICON N_40IJAE_PL
:%{front%}     NMN_40UJA/IJAE_PL ;

LEXICON N_40SAVV !!= @CODE@ savv:savvu
:%^VowRM ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
        N_40SAVV-SG ;
        N_40SAVV_PL ;
LEXICON N_40SAVV-SG
:%{back%}     NMN_40SAVV/TUEKK-SG ;
LEXICON N_40SAVV_PL
:%{back%}     NMN_40SAVV/TUEKK_PL ;

LEXICON N_40TUEKK !!= @CODE@ tükk:tü%{kØ%}kü
:%^VowRM ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
        N_40TUEKK-SG ;
        N_40TUEKK_PL ;
LEXICON N_40TUEKK-SG
:%{front%}     NMN_40SAVV/TUEKK-SG ;
LEXICON N_40TUEKK_PL
:%{front%}     NMN_40SAVV/TUEKK_PL ;

!LEXICON N_41KAND !!= @CODE@ kand:kand
!!! * Yaml: __aig, kand__
!: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
!        N_41KAND-SG ;
!        N_41KAND_PL ;

!LEXICON N_41KAND-SG
!:%{back%}     NMN_41KAND-SG ;
!LEXICON N_41KAND_PL
!:%{back%}     NMN_41KAND_PL ;

LEXICON N_41JUHT1 !!= @CODE@ juht́:juht
!! * Yaml: **juht́**
:%^PAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
+Err/Orth-no-pal:%^NoPAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
        N_41JUHT1-SG ;
 N_41JUHT1_PL ;
LEXICON N_41JUHT1-SG
:%{back%}     NMN_41JUHT1-SG ;
LEXICON N_41JUHT1_PL
:%{back%}     NMN_41JUHT1_PL ;

LEXICON N_41AIG !!= @CODE@ aig:a
!! * Yaml: **aig, aig**
:ig ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
        N_41AIG-SG ;
 N_41AIG_PL ;
LEXICON N_41AIG-SG
:%{back%}     NMN_41AIG-SG ;
LEXICON N_41AIG_PL
:%{back%}     NMN_41AIG_PL ;

LEXICON N_41ASK !!= @CODE@ aig:aig
!! * Yaml: **aig, aig**
!! ask:as%{kØ%}o
!! juusk:j%{ou%}%{ou%}s%{kØ%}u
:%^VOWRaise%^VowRM ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
        N_41ASK-SG ;
 N_41ASK_PL ;
LEXICON N_41ASK-SG
:%{back%}     NMN_41ASK/VIIT-SG ;
LEXICON N_41ASK_PL
:%{back%}     NMN_41ASK/VIIT_PL ;

LEXICON N_41MAENG !!= @CODE@ aig:aig
!! * Yaml: **aig, aig**
!! ask:as%{kØ%}o
!! juusk:j%{ou%}%{ou%}s%{kØ%}u
:%^VOWRaise%^VowRM ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
        N_41MAENG-SG ;
 N_41MAENG_PL ;
LEXICON N_41MAENG-SG
:%{back%}     NMN_41ASK/VIIT-SG ;
LEXICON N_41MAENG_PL
@U.VowHarm.F@:@U.VowHarm.F@%{back%}     NMN_41ASK/VIIT_PL ;

LEXICON N_41VIIT !!= @CODE@ aig:aig
!! * Yaml: **aig, aig**
:%^VowRM ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
        N_41VIIT-SG ;
 N_41VIIT_PL ;
LEXICON N_41VIIT-SG
:%{front%}     NMN_41ASK/VIIT-SG ;
LEXICON N_41VIIT_PL
:%{front%}     NMN_41ASK/VIIT_PL ;

!LEXICON N_41LAUL !!= @CODE@ aig:aig
!!! * Yaml: __aig, aig__
!: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
!        N_41LAUL-SG ;
! N_41LAUL_PL ;

!LEXICON N_41LAUL-SG
!:%{back%}     NMN_41LAUL-SG ;
!LEXICON N_41LAUL_PL
!:%{back%}     NMN_41LAUL_PL ;


LEXICON N_42VARI ! vari:va%{rŕ%}%{ji%}o
:%^VowRM ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
        N_42VARI-SG ;
        N_42VARI_PL ;
LEXICON N_42VARI-SG
:%{back%}     NMN_42VARI-SG ;
LEXICON N_42VARI_PL
:%{back%}     NMN_42VARI_PL ;

!LEXICON N_42TUEHI ! tühi:tüh
!:i ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
!        N_42TUEHI-SG ;
!        N_42TUEHI_PL ;
!LEXICON N_42TUEHI-SG
!:%{front%}     NMN_42TUEHI-SG ;
!LEXICON N_42TUEHI_PL
!:%{front%}     NMN_42TUEHI_PL ;


LEXICON N_43KANARIK !!= @CODE@ usklik+A:%{ˋØ%}#uskli%{kØ%}%{kg%}
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
        N_43KANARIK-SG ;
        N_43KANARIK_PL ;
LEXICON N_43KANARIK-SG
:%{back%}     NMN_43KANARIK/ELAENIK-SG ;
LEXICON N_43KANARIK_PL
:%{back%}     NMN_43KANARIK/ELAENIK_PL ;

LEXICON N_43ELAENIK !!= @CODE@ elänik+N:eläni%{kØ%}%{kg%}
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
        N_43ELAENIK-SG ;
        N_43ELAENIK_PL ;
LEXICON N_43ELAENIK-SG
@U.VowHarm.F@:@U.VowHarm.F@%{back%}     NMN_43KANARIK/ELAENIK-SG ;
LEXICON N_43ELAENIK_PL
@U.VowHarm.F@:@U.VowHarm.F@%{back%}     NMN_43KANARIK/ELAENIK_PL ;

LEXICON N_43SASLWK1 !!= @CODE@
:%^PAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
+Err/Orth-no-pal:%^NoPAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
        N_43SASLWK1-SG ;
        N_43SASLWK1_PL ;
LEXICON N_43SASLWK1-SG
:%{back%}     NMN_43SASLWK1/XX-SG ;
LEXICON N_43SASLWK1_PL
:%{back%}     NMN_43SASLWK1/XX_PL ;

LEXICON N_43APRIL1 !!= @CODE@
:%^PAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
+Err/Orth-no-pal:%^NoPAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
        N_43APRIL1-SG ;
        N_43APRIL1_PL ;
LEXICON N_43APRIL1-SG
:%{back%}     NMN_43APRIL1/SEKRETAER1-SG ;
LEXICON N_43APRIL1_PL
:%{back%}     NMN_43APRIL1/SEKRETAER1_PL ;

LEXICON N_43SEKRETAER1 !!= @CODE@
:%^PAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
+Err/Orth-no-pal:%^NoPAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
        N_43SEKRETAER1-SG ;
        N_43SEKRETAER1_PL ;
LEXICON N_43SEKRETAER1-SG
:%{front%}     NMN_43APRIL1/SEKRETAER1-SG ;
LEXICON N_43SEKRETAER1_PL
:%{front%}     NMN_43APRIL1/SEKRETAER1_PL ;

LEXICON N_43AASTAK !!= @CODE@
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
        N_43AASTAK-SG ;
        N_43AASTAK_PL ;
LEXICON N_43AASTAK-SG
:%{back%}     NMN_43AASTAK-SG ;
LEXICON N_43AASTAK_PL
:%{back%}     NMN_43AASTAK_PL ;



LEXICON N_44SWDA !!= @CODE@ sõda:sõ%{tØ%}%{tdØ%}a
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
        N_44SWDA-SG ;
 N_44SWDA_PL ;
LEXICON N_44SWDA-SG
:%{back%}     NMN_44SWDA-SG ;
LEXICON N_44SWDA_PL
:%{back%}     NMN_44SWDA_PL ;


LEXICON N_45KANA !!= @CODE@ kana:ka%{nØ%}na
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
        N_45KANA-SG ;
 N_45KANA_PL ;
LEXICON N_45KANA-SG
:%{back%}     NMN_45KANA/RIHAE-SG ;
LEXICON N_45KANA_PL
:%{back%}     NMN_45KANA/RIHAE_PL ;

LEXICON N_45RIHAE !!= @CODE@ rihä:ri%{hØ%}hä
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
        N_45RIHAE-SG ;
 N_45RIHAE_PL ;
