src/fst/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON nouns
hiir+N:hiir N_38PUTR "_hiiro, %{ˋØ%}hiiro__hiir_" ;
hütt+N:hü%{tØ%}t N_38HUETT "_#ü, #tü __hüt|t_" ;
kriiḱ+N:kr%{ei%}%{ei%}k N_38SUEUEK1 "_kreegi, kri̬i̬ki__kri̬i̬ḱ_" ;
kuldnokk+N:kuldno%{kØ%}k N_38KULD "_#a, #ka__kuldnok|k_" ;
lüüv́+N:l%{öü%}%{öü%}%{vv́%} N_38SUEUEK1 "_löövi, lü̬ü̬vi__lü̬ü̬v́_" ;
märk+N:mär%{kg%} N_38PUTR "_märgo, %{ˋØ%}märko__märk_" ;
nõiakõld+N:nõiakõl%{dl%} N_38KULD "_#kõlla, #%{ˋØ%}kõlda__nõia|kõld_" ;
piit́+N:p%{ei%}%{ei%}t N_38SUEUEK1 "_peedi, pi̬i̬ti__pi̬i̬t́_" ;
putr+N:pu%{td%}r N_38PUTR "_pudro, %{ˋØ%}putro __putr_" ;
runk+N:run%{kg%} N_38KULD "_runga, %{ˋØ%}runka__runk_" ;
siiṕ+N:s%{ei%}%{ei%}p N_38SUEUEK1 "_seebi, si̬i̬pi__si̬i̬ṕ_" ;
tulp+N:tul%{pb%} N_38KULD "_tulba, %{ˋØ%}tulpa__tulp_" ;
vetr+N:ve%{td%}r N_38PUTR "_vedro, %{ˋØ%}vetro__vetr_" ;
häbü+N:hä%{pbØ%}ü N_39HAEBUE "_#ü, #pü__hä|bü_" ;
ḱago+N:ḱa%{kgØ%}o N_39VIDO "_#o, #ko__ḱa|go_" ;
luba+N:lu%{pbØ%}a N_39VIDO "_#a, #pa__lu|ba_" ;
pego+N:pe%{kgØ%}o N_39VIDO "_#o, #ko__pe|go_" ;
säitsmesjago+N:%{ˋØ%}#säitsmesja%{kgØ%}o N_39VIDO "_#ndäjao, #ndätjako__ˋsäitsme|sjago_" ;
kahu+N:ka%{hØ%}hu N_40TALO "_#u, #hu__kah|u_" ;
kakkõhelü+N:kakkõhe%{lØ%}lü N_40HELUE "_#ü, #lü__kakkõhel|ü_" ;
kälü+N:kä%{lØ%}lü N_40HELUE "_#ü, #lü__käl|ü_" ;
latsikodo+N:%{ˋØ%}#latsiko%{td%}o N_40TALO "_#do, #to__ˋlatsiko|do_" ;
pido+N:pi%{td%}o N_40TALO "_#do, #to __pi|do_" ;
prügü+N:prü%{kg%}ü N_40HELUE "_#gü, #kü __prü|gü_" ;
taro+N:ta%{rØ%}ro N_40TALO "_#o, #ro__tar|o_" ;
tüdü+N:tü%{td%}ü N_40HELUE "_#dü, #tü__tü|dü_" ;
savv+N:sa%{vØ%}vu N_40SAVV ;
tükk+N:tü%{kØ%}kü N_40TUEKK "_#ü, #kü__tük|k_" ;
uja+N:u%{jØ%}ja N_40UJA "_uja, ujja uia__uja_" ;
oja+N:o%{jØ%}ja N_40UJA "_uja, ujja uia__uja_" ;
vaihõaig+N:vaihõ#ai N_41AIG ;
aastagaaig+N:%{ˋØ%}#aastaga#ai N_41AIG "_#ao, #%{ˋØ%}aigo__ˋaastaga|aig_" ;
aig+N:#ai N_41AIG "_ao, %{ˋØ%}aigo__aig_" ;
juht́+N:juh%{td%}i N_41JUHT1 "_juhi, %{ˋØ%}juhti__juht́_" ;
kand+N:kan%{dn%}o N_41ASK "_kanno, %{ˋØ%}kando__kand_" ;
keskaig+N:kesk#ai N_41AIG "_#ao, #%{ˋØ%}aigo__kesk|aig_" ;
kodovävü+N:kodovä%{vØ%}vü N_41VIIT "_#vävvü, #%{ˋØ%}vävvü__kodo|vävü_" ;
leppmaim+N:leppmaimo N_41ASK "_#maimo, #%{ˋØ%}maimo__lepp|maim_" ;
liht́+N:lih%{tØ%}i N_41JUHT1 "_lihi, %{ˋØ%}lihti __liht́_" ;
läük+N:läü%{kg%}ü N_41VIIT "_läügü, %{ˋØ%}läükü__läük_" ;
napuq+N:na%{pØ%}pu N_41ASK_PL "_nappõ, nappõ__napuq_" ;
org+N:or%{gØ%}o N_41ASK "_oro, %{ˋØ%}orgo__org_" ;
peräpütt+N:peräpü%{tØ%}tü N_41VIIT "_#ü, #tü__peräpüt|t_" ;
radoaig+N:rado#ai N_41AIG "_#ao, #%{ˋØ%}aigo__rado|aig_" ;
rõuk+N:rõu%{kg%}u N_41ASK "_rõugu, %{ˋØ%}rõuku__rõuk_" ;
süüt+N:s%{öü%}%{öü%}%{td%}ü N_41VIIT "_söödü, sü̬ü̬tü__sü̬ü̬t_" ;
taht́+N:tah%{tØ%}i N_41JUHT1 "_tahi, %{ˋØ%}tahti__taht́_" ;
tsiht́+N:tsih%{tØ%}i N_41JUHT1 "_tsihi, %{ˋØ%}tsihti __tsiht́_" ;
kuhi+N:ku%{hh́%}%{jiØ%}a N_42VARI "_kuh́a, %{ˋØ%}kuhja__kuhi_" ;
praadiahi+N:praadia%{hh́%}%{jiØ%}o N_42VARI "_#aho, #%{ˋØ%}ahjo__praadi|ahi_" ;
turi+N:tu%{rŕ%}%{jiØ%}o N_42VARI "_tuŕo, %{ˋØ%}turjo __turi_" ;
vari+N:va%{rŕ%}%{jiØ%}o N_42VARI "_vaŕo, %{ˋØ%}varjo__vari_" ;
saslõḱ+N:saslõk N_43SASLWK1 "_#gi, #kki_" ;
skorpioń+N:skorpio%{nń%} N_43SASLWK1 "_#gi, #kki_" ;
sampinjoń+N:sampinjo%{nń%} N_43SASLWK1 "_#i, #ni_"	   ;
aestak+N:%{ˋØ%}#aestak N_43AASTAK "_#ga, #kka__ˋaesta|k_" ;
hapasnik+N:hapasni%{kg%} N_43KANARIK "_#gu, #kku__hapasni|k_" ;
kõrtśnik+N:%{ˋØ%}#kõrtśni%{kg%} N_43KANARIK "_#gu, #kku__ˋkõrtśni|k_" ;
põdristik+N:põdristi%{kg%} N_43KANARIK "_#gu, #kku__põdristi|k_" ;
saa#aastak+N:saa#%{ˋØ%}aastak N_43AASTAK "_#ga, #kka__saa#%{ˋØ%}aasta|k_" ;
tuhataastak+N:tuhat%{ˋØ%}aastak N_43AASTAK "_#ga, #kka__tuhat%{ˋØ%}aasta|k_" ;
võimlik+N:%{ˋØ%}#võimli%{kg%} N_43KANARIK "_#gu, #kku__ˋvõimli|k_" ;
pada+N:pa%{tdØ%}a N_44SWDA "_#a, #ta__pa|da_" ;
raǵa+N:raǵa N_44SWDA "_#ja, #ḱa __ra|ǵa_" ;
tsirgurada+N:tsirgura%{tdØ%}a N_44SWDA "_#a, #ta__tsirgura|da_" ;
kusõkala+N:kusõka%{lØ%}la N_45KANA "_#a, #la __kusõkal|a_" ;
pininõna+N:pininõ̭%{nØ%}na N_45KANA "_#a, #na__pininõ̭n|a_" ;
rihä+N:ri%{hØ%}hä N_45RIHAE "_#ä, #hä __rih|ä_" ;
valaskala+N:valaska%{lØ%}la N_45KANA "_#a, #la__valaskal|a_" ;
